Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3006
Behavioral health regions; powers.

The behavioral health regions may offer services to and work with agencies and organizations, including, but not limited to, schools, universities, colleges, the State Department of Education, the Department of Veterans' Affairs, law enforcement agencies, and local health departments, to develop a program that offers grants to implement the Nebraska Mental Health First Aid Training Act in ways that are representative and inclusive with respect to the economic and cultural diversity of this state.

Laws 2014, LB901, § 7;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 161.
April 8, 2026